Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-408
Aid or grants; powers.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska and the chief administrative officer of the University of Nebraska at Kearney, through the curator, may apply for and receive aid or grants from state sources, private foundations, local art organizations, or the federal government.

Laws 1979, LB 116, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 16.